Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 10. Arctic Infrastructure Development.

Effective dates. —

Section 10, ch. 93, SLA 2014, which enacted this article, took effect October 14, 2014.

Sec. 44.88.800.
Arctic infrastructure development program.

The Arctic infrastructure development program is created in the authority to promote and provide financing for Arctic infrastructure development.

History.

(§ 10 ch 93 SLA 2014)

Sec. 44.88.810.
Arctic infrastructure development fund.

The Arctic infrastructure development fund is established in the authority. The fund consists of appropriations made to the fund by the legislature, money or other assets transferred to the fund by a majority vote of the members of the authority under AS

44.88.050

from any other fund controlled by the authority, and unrestricted loan repayments, interest, or other income earned on loans, investments, or assets of the fund. The fund is not an account in the revolving fund established in AS

44.88.060

, and the authority shall account for the fund separately from the revolving fund. The authority may create additional accounts in the fund. Subject to agreements made with the holders of the authority’s bonds or with other persons, the authority may transfer amounts in an account in the fund to another account in the fund. Amounts deposited in the fund may be pledged to the payment of bonds of the authority or expended for the purposes of AS

44.88.800

—

44.88.840

. The authority has the powers and responsibilities established in AS

37.10.071

with respect to the investment of amounts held in the fund.

History.

(§ 10 ch 93 SLA 2014)

Sec. 44.88.820.
Use of fund balance.

Subject to the requirements of AS

44.88.800

—

44.88.840

, the authority may use money in the Arctic infrastructure development fund (AS

44.88.810

) for Arctic infrastructure development.

History.

(§ 10 ch 93 SLA 2014)

Sec. 44.88.830.
Qualified infrastructure development; powers and duties of the authority.

Subject to the limitations of AS

44.88.840

, for Arctic infrastructure development, the authority may

use the Arctic infrastructure development fund (AS

44.88.810

) to finance Arctic infrastructure development, insure project obligations, guarantee loans or bonds, and establish reserves;

acquire real or personal property by purchase, transfer, or foreclosure when the acquisition is necessary to protect the authority’s interest in financing;

defer principal payments or capitalize interest on Arctic infrastructure development;

subject to AS

36.30.085(e)

, enter into lease agreements, sales-lease-back agreements, build-operate-transfer and operate-transfer agreements, or any similar project financing agreement for a qualified Arctic infrastructure development;

enter into agreements with government entities for the transfer and control of infrastructure, facilities, rights-of-way, and studies;

contract for services with a professional advisor, including an attorney, bond counsel, engineer, or other technical expert necessary to fulfill the purposes of the program; and

subject to AS

44.88.090

, borrow money and issue bonds.

The authority shall adopt regulations to implement AS

44.88.800

—

44.88.840

, including

a process for acquiring financing under this section;

qualifications for Arctic infrastructure development projects applying for financing under this section; and

fiscal controls and accounting procedures for the fund.

History.

(§ 10 ch 93 SLA 2014)

Sec. 44.88.840.
Limitations on financing.

Unless the authority has obtained legislative approval by law, the authority may not use the Arctic infrastructure development fund established in AS

44.88.810

to make

a loan for more than one-third of the capital cost of an Arctic infrastructure development; or

a loan guarantee if the amount of the guarantee exceeds $20,000,000.

Financing under AS

44.88.830

is limited to the projected life of the Arctic infrastructure development, which may not be more than 40 years.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the authority may use the Arctic infrastructure development fund established in AS

44.88.810

as security for a bond guarantee.

The authority may guarantee a loan under AS

44.88.830

if the loan is made to a business with a majority interest held by state residents.

History.

(§ 10 ch 93 SLA 2014)